Utah statutes.
78B-14-612.   Recognition of order modified in another state.

If a child-support order issued by a tribunal of this state is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter, a tribunal of this state:

(1)  may enforce its order that was modified only as to arrears and interest accruing before the modification;

(2)  may provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

(3)  shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

